Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Annual Report and License Tax

§ 17-19-1630.
Filing of reports.

Every Wyoming nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state and every foreign nonprofit corporation which obtains the right to transact and carry on its affairs within this state shall file an annual report setting forth the names and addresses of its officers and directors, the address of its principal office, and any compensation, profit or pecuniary advantage paid directly or indirectly to any officer or director.

The annual report required in subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the month of registration of every year.

A director or officer of the corporation shall execute the annual report under penalty of perjury.

A fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be collected by the secretary of state upon initial incorporation or qualification and an annual franchise fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall accompany the annual report.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction.

The information in the annual report shall be current on the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

Any foreign nonprofit corporation transacting business in Wyoming without qualifying is subject to the penalties provided by W.S. 17-16-1502(d).

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 35, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to perjury and criminal falsification, see §

6-5-301

et seq.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), inserted “and” following “the address of its principal office.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "fifty dollars ($50.00)" for "twenty-five dollars ($25.00)" preceding "shall be collected" in (d).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§§ 17-19-1631 through 17-19-1633.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 192, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to the forfeiture of a domestic nonprofit corporation's charter and a foreign nonprofit corporation's right to do business for failure to file the annual report and/or to pay the license tax, and to the procedure for reinstatement of rights.

Prospective application. —

Laws 1997, ch. 192, § 5, provides: “A domestic corporation or foreign corporation whose certificate of incorporation or right to carry on business in this state has been forfeited pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1631

or

17-19-1631

prior to the effective date of this act shall be entitled to apply for reinstatement of its certificate or right to carry on business in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-1632 and 17-16-1633 and 17-19-1632 and 17-19-1633 prior to their repeal by this act.”